Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Legislators’ Retirement Plan
6.521.
Increase of retirement benefits.

As of July 1 of each year, the board of trustees of the Kentucky Judicial Form Retirement System shall recompute the monthly benefits of persons then receiving benefits under the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, provided the person began participating in the plan prior to January 1, 2014, by using the following formula: three and one-half percent (3.5%) times fifty-five percent (55%) of the final compensation of the office in which the credit was earned for a person retiring as of the recomputation date, times the number of years of service credit (not to exceed twenty-eight (28) years). In making the recomputation, the same reduction factor, in case of an actuarially reduced benefit or a surviving spouse’s benefit, shall be used as was used in determining the benefit then being received. If the benefit as recomputed in accordance with this section is higher than the benefit then being received, the recomputed benefit shall thereafter be paid monthly, commencing as of the date specified for the recomputation, subject to future adjustment at ensuing recomputations in accordance with this section.

Effective August 1, 1998, to July 1, 2008, a recipient of a monthly pension benefit from the Legislators’ Retirement Plan who began participating in the plan prior to January 1, 2014, shall have his or her benefit increased on July 1 of each year by the percentage increase in the annual average of the consumer price index for all urban consumers for the most recent calendar year as published by the Federal Bureau of Labor Statistics, not to exceed five percent (5%). In determining the state’s appropriation to the Legislators’ Retirement Fund, only the costs of increases granted as of the most recent valuation date shall be recognized. The benefits of this subsection as provided on August 1, 1998, to July 1, 2008, shall not be considered as benefits protected by the inviolable contract provisions of KRS

6.505

. The General Assembly reserves the right to suspend or reduce the benefits conferred in this subsection if in its judgment the welfare of the Commonwealth so demands.

Effective July 1, 2009, and on July 1 of each year thereafter, a recipient of a monthly pension benefit from the Legislators’ Retirement Plan shall have his or her benefit increased by one and one-half percent (1.5%), if:

The funding level of the plan is greater than one hundred percent (100%) and subsequent legislation authorizes the use of any surplus actuarial assets to provide an increase in retirement allowances described by this subsection; or

The General Assembly appropriates sufficient funds to fully prefund the increase described by this subsection in the year the increase is provided.

The board of trustees of the Kentucky Judicial Form Retirement System shall, at least thirty (30) days prior to the beginning of regular sessions of the General Assembly held in even-numbered years, advise the General Assembly of the following:

Whether the plan has a funding level greater than one hundred percent (100%) and if the plan can support an increase in recipients’ retirement allowances as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection over the next budget biennium without reducing the funding level of the plan below one hundred percent (100%); and

If no surplus actuarial assets are available, the level of funds needed to fully prefund an increase for plan recipients over the next budget biennium if a one and one-half percent (1.5%) increase is provided annually over the biennium.

For purposes of this subsection, “funding level” means the actuarial value of assets divided by the actuarially accrued liability expressed as a percentage that is determined and reported by the plan’s actuary in the plan’s actuarial valuation.

The full increase described by this subsection shall only be provided if the recipient has been receiving a retirement benefit for at least twelve (12) months prior to the effective date of the increase. If the recipient has been receiving a benefit for less than twelve (12) months prior to the effective date of the increase provided by this subsection, the increase shall be reduced on a pro rata basis for each month the recipient has not been receiving a benefit in the twelve (12) months preceding the effective date of the increase.

In determining the state’s appropriation to the Legislators’ Retirement Fund, only the costs of increases granted as of the most recent valuation date shall be recognized.

The benefits of this subsection as provided on July 1, 2009, and thereafter shall not be considered as benefits protected by the inviolable contract provisions of KRS

6.505

. The General Assembly reserves the right to suspend or reduce the benefits conferred in this subsection if in its judgment the welfare of the Commonwealth so demands.

In addition to the increase to a recipient’s retirement allowance as provided by subsection (3) of this section, the General Assembly may, by subsequent legislation, provide supplemental increases to a recipient’s retirement allowance to help adjust for actual changes in the recipient’s cost of living if the General Assembly appropriates sufficient funds to fully prefund the benefit in the year the increase is provided.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 380, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 360, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2008 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 2, effective June 27, 2008; 2013, ch. 120, § 16, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/1/2013). This statute was amended by Section 16 of
2013 Ky. Acts ch. 120. Section 81 of that Act reads, “Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act to the contrary, the amendments in Sections 16, 25, and 69 of this Act shall in no way nullify the provisions of
2012 Ky. Acts ch. 19, Part I, 1.(4),
2012 Ky. Acts ch. 68, Part I, 2.(2), or
2012 Ky. Acts ch. 144, Part IV, 10., which suspended the cost-of-living adjustment that would have been provided to retirees and beneficiaries of the Legislative Retirement Plan, the Judicial Retirement Plan, the State Police Retirement System, the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, and the County Employees Retirement System on July 1, 2012, and July 1, 2013.”

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Legislative Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 200, Pt. I, A, 1, (4) at 1764.

6.525.
Statutes governing plan — Exceptions — Consolidation of accounts — Combining service credit.

The Legislators’ Retirement Plan shall be governed by KRS

21.560

and by provisions identical in terms with those provided in KRS 21.345(1), 21.345(3) to (6),

21.357

, 21.360(1),

21.370

to

21.410

,

21.374

,

21.420

,

21.425

,

21.450

,

21.460

,

21.470

,

21.480

,

21.525

,

21.540

, and

61.552

for the Judicial Retirement Plan, except that:

Five (5) years of service as a legislator will be sufficient for vesting; and

A member of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan may combine his or her service credit with his or her service credit in the Teachers’ Retirement System, Kentucky Employees Retirement System, County Employees Retirement System, and State Police Retirement System at the time of his or her retirement, according to the procedure of KRS 61.680(2)(a), except that the salary used to determine final compensation, if applicable, shall be based on the creditable compensation in KRS 61.510(13) for service while a member of the General Assembly whether or not a member of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan.

For members contributing on or after June 20, 2005, but prior to January 1, 2014: Upon retirement, a member’s accounts under the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, State Police Retirement System, Kentucky Employees Retirement System, County Employees Retirement System, and Teachers’ Retirement System shall be consolidated for the purpose of determining eligibility and amount of benefits as provided in KRS 61.680(2)(a) and in the same manner as for the other retirement systems using the highest salary regardless of the system in which it was earned.

For purposes of this paragraph, “retirement” means the month in which the member elects to begin receiving benefits or benefits become payable due to the member’s death.

A member who has an account in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan and the Judicial Retirement Plan may combine his or her service in both plans for purposes of determining:

Eligibility and the amount of benefits; and

Final compensation, provided the member began participating in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014.

A member who began participating in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, may retire at the completion of twenty-seven (27) or more years of combined service credit, so long as at least fifteen (15) years of such credit were earned after January 1, 1960, and there shall be no reduction in the retirement allowance because of retirement before the age of sixty-five (65).

For the purposes of this section, any reference in the KRS sections listed above to the Judicial Retirement Plan shall also be read as a reference to the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, and any reference to the Legislators’ Retirement Plan shall also be read as a reference to the Judicial Retirement Plan.

Any other statute to the contrary notwithstanding, a member of any state-administered retirement system who has ceased to qualify for membership but subsequently returns to a qualified status, shall, for the purposes of determining the date of entry into the state-administered retirement system for the subsequent period or periods of service, be deemed to have never left the retirement system.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 407, § 16, effective July 1, 1980; 1982, ch. 326, § 13, effective July 1, 1982; 1982, ch. 458, § 5, effective April 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 299, § 5, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 489, § 14, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 266, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 31, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 389, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 90, § 5, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 128, § 3, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 86, § 5, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 148, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 120, § 17, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 12, § 2, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 125, § 9, effective March 27, 2017; 2018 ch. 107, § 4, effective July 14, 2018; 2022 ch. 55, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 (2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.

(7/1/2013). Section 17 of
2013 Ky. Acts ch. 120 amended the opening sentence of this statute to insert “Section 12 of this Act” into the list of KRS sections whose terms govern the Legislators Retirement Plan. Section 12 of that Act created
KRS

21.402

. However, the Reviser of Statutes has not inserted a specific reference to
KRS

21.402

in this list, since the list contains a range of statutes (
KRS

21.370

to

21.410

) that includes
KRS 21.402.

6.530.
Legislators’ retirement fund — Established.

There is hereby established, within the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, a state fund to be known as the Legislators’ Retirement Fund, which shall consist of the plan members’ contributions, state appropriations to the fund, transfers of money as provided in KRS

6.535

and Section 25 of Acts 1980, Chapter 407, and earnings from investment of the fund. The fund may have a subordinate administrative account. The benefits provided to be paid by reason of membership in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan shall not be chargeable to any other retirement fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 407, § 17, effective July 1, 1980.

6.535.
Service credit, disposition of.

When a legislator has service credit in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, County Employees Retirement System, State Police Retirement System, or Teachers’ Retirement System, earned for service as a legislator, which credit by virtue of KRS

6.505

will become credit in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, such other system shall transfer to the legislators’ retirement fund an amount equal to the employee’s and employer’s contributions attributable to that credit, together with interest on each such contribution, from the date it was made to the date of transfer, at the statutory rate, if any, applicable to such contributions, or if none, at the rates of interest assumed by such other system for actuarial purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 407, § 24, effective July 1, 1980; 1982, ch. 458, § 7, effective April 15, 1982.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Kentucky Employees Retirement System must transfer to the legislators’ retirement system interest on the employee’s contributions accumulated in each legislator’s member’s account at the actuarially assumed interest rate in effect at the time the contribution was made compounded annually at that same interest rate.

OAG 80-630

.